Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.160

Creditable service.

(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 41.40.150, at retirement the total service credited to a member shall consist of all membership service and, if he or she is an original member, all of the certified prior service.

(2) Employees of a public utility or other private enterprise all or any portion of which has been heretofore or may be hereafter acquired by a public agency as a matter of public convenience and necessity, where it is in the public interest to retain the trained personnel of such enterprise, all service to that enterprise shall, upon the acquiring public agency becoming an employer as defined in *RCW 41.40.010(4) be credited on the same basis as if rendered to the said employer: PROVIDED, That this shall apply only to those employees who were in the service of the enterprise at or prior to the time of acquisition by the public agency and who remain in the service of the acquiring agency until they attain membership in the state employees' retirement system; and to those employees who were in the service of the enterprise at the time of acquisition by the public agency and subsequently attain membership through employment with any participating agency: PROVIDED FURTHER, In the event that the acquiring agency is an employer at the time of the acquisition, employer's contributions in connection with members achieving service credit hereunder shall be made on the same basis as set forth in RCW ** 41.40.045 and 41.40.048 for an employer admitted after April 1, 1949, and before July 23, 1995, and on the same basis as set forth in RCW 41.40.057 for an employer admitted after July 23, 1995.

[ 1995 c 286 s 5; 1991 c 35 s 77; 1989 c 273 s 27; 1965 c 155 s 4; 1963 c 174 s 9; 1953 c 200 s 8; 1951 c 50 s 4; 1949 c 240 s 11; 1947 c 274 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-17.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 41.40.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (4) to subsection (13).

**(2) RCW 41.40.045 was repealed by 1995 c 286 s 6.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.